src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-vuejted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - vuejted: # Verb 'to drive,  causative' - full paradigm
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuejtam
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuejtak
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuejat
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuejtep
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuejteʹped
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuejte 
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: vuejtet

     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuejtem
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuejtiǩ
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuejti
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vuejtim, vuejtin]
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuejtid
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuejte
     vuejted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: vuejteš

     vuejted+V+Pot+Sg1: vuejteʹžem
     vuejted+V+Pot+Sg2: vuejteʹžiǩ
     vuejted+V+Pot+Sg3: vuejtež
     vuejted+V+Pot+Pl1: [vuejteʹžep, vuejteʹžim, vuejteʹžin]
     vuejted+V+Pot+Pl2: vuejteʹžid 
     vuejted+V+Pot+Pl3: vuejteʹže
     vuejted+V+Pot+Sg4: vuejteʹžet
     vuejted+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuejteʹže

     vuejted+V+Cond+Sg1: vuejteʹčem
     vuejted+V+Cond+Sg2: vuejteʹčiǩ
     vuejted+V+Cond+Sg3: vuejteʹči
     vuejted+V+Cond+Pl1: [vuejteʹčim, vuejteʹčin, vuejteʹčep]
     vuejted+V+Cond+Pl2: vuejteʹčid
     vuejted+V+Cond+Pl3: vuejteʹče
     vuejted+V+Cond+Sg4: vuejteʹčeš
     vuejted+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuejteʹče

     vuejted+V+Imprt+Sg2: vuejat
     vuejted+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuejtââǥǥas
     vuejted+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuejtâkap
     vuejted+V+Imprt+Pl2: vuejteʹǩed
     vuejted+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuejtâkaz
     vuejted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: vuejtuku
     vuejted+V+Actio+Ess: vuejteʹmen
     vuejted+V+Actio: vuejtam
     vuejted+V+Act+PrsPrc: vuejteei
     vuejted+V+Act+PrfPrc: vuejtam
     vuejted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [vuejtummu, vuejtuum]
     vuejted+V+VAbess: vuejteǩâni
     vuejted+V+Ger+Ess: vuejteen
     vuejted+V+Ger+Instr: vuejteeʹl
